Alaska statutes. Title 5. Amusements and Sports.
Article 2. Licenses, Permits, and Registrations.

Administrative Code. —

For permits and licenses for games of chance and skill, see 15 AAC 160, art. 1.

Sec. 05.15.100.
Issuance of permits and licenses.

The department may issue a permit to a municipality or qualified organization. The permit gives the municipality or qualified organization the privilege of conducting bingo, raffles and lotteries, pull-tab games, ice classics, race classics, rain classics, goose classics, mercury classics, deep freeze classics, canned salmon classics, salmon classics, king salmon classics, dog mushers’ contests, snow classics, snow machine classics, fish derbies, animal classics, crane classics, cabbage classics, Calcutta pools, big bull moose derbies, and contests of skill.

[Repealed, § 5 ch 105 SLA 1995.]

The department may issue an operator’s license to a natural person to conduct an activity permitted under this chapter, other than a Calcutta pool, on behalf of a municipality or a qualified organization. The department may also issue an operator’s license to a municipality or a qualified organization to conduct an activity, other than a Calcutta pool, on behalf of another municipality or qualified organization.

The department may issue a multiple-beneficiary permit to two to six municipalities or qualified organizations or to a combination of two to six municipalities and qualified organizations that apply jointly for the permit. The permit gives the permit holders the privilege of jointly conducting the activities specified in (a) of this section.

History.

(§ 1 a ch 27 SLA 1960; am § 1 ch 66 SLA 1976; am § 2 ch 27 SLA 1982; am § 2 ch 59 SLA 1983; am § 1 ch 93 SLA 1986; am § 2 ch 94 SLA 1986; am §§ 11, 12 ch 99 SLA 1988; am § 2 ch 24 SLA 1991; am § 6 ch 70 SLA 1993; am E.O. No. 82 § 7 (1993); am § 1 ch 16 SLA 1994; am §§ 1, 2 ch 13 SLA 1995; am § 1 ch 104 SLA 1995; am §§ 1, 5 ch 105 SLA 1995; am §§ 1, 6 ch 41 SLA 1997; am § 1 ch 162 SLA 2004; am §§ 3, 4 ch 43 SLA 2005; am § 1 ch 20 SLA 2008; am § 1 ch 62 SLA 2012; am § 2 ch 22 SLA 2014)

Administrative Code. —

For permits and licenses, see 15 AAC 160, art. 1.

For operators, see 15 AAC 160, art. 2.

For multiple-beneficiary permits and self-directed permits, see 15 AAC 160, art. 4.

For bingo, see 15 AAC 160, art. 6.

For raffles, lotteries, and other gaming activities, see 15 AAC 160, art. 7.

For accounting and recordkeeping, see 15 AAC 160, art. 8.

For suspension and revocation, see 15 AAC 160, art. 9.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2012 amendment, effective September 10, 2012, in (a), added “snow classics,” following “dog mushers’ contests,”.

The 2014 amendment, effective September 15, 2014, in (a), inserted “big bull moose derbies,” following “Calcutta pools,”.

Sec. 05.15.105.
Persons prohibited from involvement.

If a person has been convicted of a violation of a law of this state that is, or a law or ordinance of another jurisdiction that would be if it had been committed in this state, a felony, or a violation of a law or ordinance of this state or another jurisdiction that is a crime involving theft or dishonesty or a violation of gambling laws

the department may not issue a license to the person;

the department may not issue a license to, or register as a vendor, an applicant who employs the person in a managerial or supervisory capacity or uses the person as a fund raiser or consultant;

the department may not issue a permit for an activity if the person is responsible for the operation of the activity;

the person may not be employed in a managerial or supervisory capacity by a licensee or vendor or used as a fund raiser or consultant by a licensee or vendor;

the person may not participate in charitable gaming as a permittee, licensee, or vendor.

The department shall adopt regulations that provide that a disqualification of a person under (a) of this section based upon a conviction of that person for a violation

of a law of this state that is, or a law or ordinance of another jurisdiction that would be if it was committed in this state, a class B felony other than extortion, a class C felony, or an unclassified felony described outside of AS 11, and that is not a crime of dishonesty or theft or a violation of gambling laws, terminates 10 years after the person’s conviction;

of a law or ordinance of this state or another jurisdiction that is a crime involving theft or dishonesty or a violation of gambling laws, and that is not, or would not be if it was committed in this state, an unclassified felony described in AS 11, a class A felony, or extortion, terminates 10 years after the person’s conviction, if the department determines that the

person is of good character, honesty, and integrity; and

person’s involvement in charitable gaming is not against the public interest.

History.

(§ 7 ch 70 SLA 1993)

Administrative Code. —

For permits and licenses, see 15 AAC 160, art. 1.

For multiple-beneficiary permits and self-directed permits, see 15 AAC 160, art. 4.

For suspension and revocation, see 15 AAC 160, art. 9.

Sec. 05.15.110.
Authorized activities a privilege.

The activities specified in AS

05.15.100

may be permitted as a privilege and do not confer a right upon any person to conduct the activities.

History.

(§ 1 b ch 27 SLA 1960)

Sec. 05.15.112.
Member in charge.

Each municipality or qualified organization that applies for a permit under this chapter shall designate a member in charge and at least one alternate member in charge. The member in charge and alternate members in charge designated must have passed a test formulated by the department on the contents of this chapter and the regulations adopted under this chapter. The department shall administer the test at least four times a year. Municipalities and qualified organizations that hold a multiple-beneficiary permit shall jointly designate one member in charge and at least one alternate member in charge.

The member in charge is responsible for preparation, maintenance, and transmittal of all records and reports required of the permittee, and, if the permittee has entered into a contract with an operator under AS

05.15.115

, for monitoring the operator’s performance under and compliance with that contract. The alternate members in charge are responsible for the duties of the member in charge in the absence of the member in charge. The member in charge and the alternate members in charge shall be members of the qualified organization or the board of directors of the qualified organization or employees of the municipality. In the case of a multiple-beneficiary permit, the member in charge and the alternate members in charge shall be members of one of the qualified organizations or the board of directors of one of the qualified organizations or employees of one of the municipalities.

The member in charge shall monitor the operator’s performance under and compliance with contracts for the conduct of activities on behalf of the authorizing permittee.

The municipality or qualified organization, or the holders of a multiple-beneficiary permit, shall designate alternate members in charge who are responsible for the duties of the member in charge in the absence of the member in charge.

If a permittee’s designated member in charge or sole alternate member in charge resigns or is no longer able to serve as member in charge or alternate member in charge, the permittee has six months to replace the member in charge or alternate member in charge with a person who meets the requirements of this section, and to notify the department of the replacement. If after six months the permittee has not replaced the member in charge or alternate member in charge with a person who meets the requirements of this section, or has not notified the department of the replacement, the permittee’s permit is suspended until the requirements of this subsection are met.

History.

(§ 13 ch 99 SLA 1988; am §§ 8 — 13 ch 70 SLA 1993; am § 2 ch 32 SLA 1997)

Administrative Code. —

For permits and licenses, see 15 AAC 160, art. 1.

Sec. 05.15.115.
Contracts between permittees and operators.

A municipality or qualified organization holding a permit to conduct an activity under this chapter may enter into a contract with an operator licensed under this chapter to conduct on behalf of the municipality or qualified organization those activities permitted under the authority of the permit.

The contract between an authorizing permittee and an operator must include the amount and form of compensation to be paid to the operator, the term of the contract, the activities to be conducted by the operator on behalf of the permittee, the location where the activities are to be conducted, the name and address of the member in charge, and other provisions the department may require.

A permittee may not contract with more than one operator at a time to conduct the same type of activity. For the purposes of this subsection, bingo games, raffles, lotteries, pull-tab games, ice classics, race classics, rain classics, goose classics, mercury classics, deep freeze classics, canned salmon classics, salmon classics, king salmon classics, dog mushers’ contests, snow classics, snow machine classics, fish derbies, animal classics, crane classics, cabbage classics, big bull moose derbies, and contests of skill are each a different type of activity.

A permittee shall submit by certified mail to the department for approval a copy of each contract with an operator with whom the permittee contracts to conduct activities subject to this chapter. The contract must meet the requirements of this section. The department shall approve or disapprove the contract. If the contract is disapproved, reasons for the disapproval shall be provided in writing to the permittee. Activities may not be conducted under the contract before the contract is approved. Subsequent amendments to an approved contract do not take effect until the amendments are approved by the department.

History.

(§ 13 ch 99 SLA 1988; am § 3 ch 24 SLA 1991; am § 14 ch 70 SLA 1993; am § 2 ch 16 SLA 1994; am §§ 3, 4 ch 13 SLA 1995; am § 2 ch 104 SLA 1995; am § 2 ch 105 SLA 1995; am §§ 2, 7 ch 41 SLA 1997; am § 2 ch 162 SLA 2004; am § 5 ch 43 SLA 2005; am § 2 ch 20 SLA 2008; am § 2 ch 62 SLA 2012; am § 3 ch 22 SLA 2014)

Revisor’s notes. —

The amendment made to subsection (c) by § 4, ch. 13, SLA 1995, as amended by § 7, ch. 41, SLA 1997, which took effect January 1, 2000, contained an erroneous reference to activities permitted under AS

05.15.100(b)

. That reference does not appear in the text because AS

05.15.100(b)

was repealed by § 5, ch. 105, SLA 1995.

Administrative Code. —

For operators, see 15 AAC 160, art. 2.

For bingo, see 15 AAC 160, art. 6.

For raffles, lotteries, and other gaming activities, see 15 AAC 160, art. 7.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2012 amendment, effective September 10, 2012, in (c), added “snow classics,” following “dog mushers’ contests,”.

The 2014 amendment, effective September 15, 2014, in (c), inserted “big bull moose derbies,” following “cabbage classics,”.

Sec. 05.15.120.
Eligibility for permit.

An applicant shall be a municipality or qualified organization to be eligible for a permit.

History.

(§ 1 c ch 27 SLA 1960; am § 3 ch 27 SLA 1982)

Administrative Code. —

For permits and licenses, see 15 AAC 160, art. 1.

Sec. 05.15.122.
Operator’s license.

A person, municipality, or qualified organization may not conduct an activity subject to this chapter on behalf of a municipality or qualified organization unless the person, municipality, or qualified organization has received an operator’s license issued by the department.

The department may issue an operator’s license to a natural person, municipality, or qualified organization that

applies on the form provided by the department;

pays the annual fee of $500;

discloses the identity of persons employed by the applicant in a managerial or supervisory capacity;

submits proof of liability insurance satisfactory to the department;

posts a bond or security satisfactory to the department in the amount of $25,000 for each permit under which the operator operates up to a maximum of $100,000; and

if a natural person, has passed a test formulated by the department on the contents of this chapter and the regulations adopted under this chapter and administered by the department at least four times a year; or, if a municipality or qualified organization, has designated a municipal employee or member of the organization who has passed this test.

[Repealed, § 37 ch 70 SLA 1993.]

[Repealed, § 37 ch 70 SLA 1993.]

History.

(§ 14 ch 99 SLA 1988; am §§ 15, 37 ch 70 SLA 1993)

Administrative Code. —

For permits and licenses, see 15 AAC 160, art. 1.

For operators, see 15 AAC 160, art. 2.

For suspension and revocation, see 15 AAC 160, art. 9.

Sec. 05.15.124.
Municipal regulation of operators or vendors.

A municipality may by ordinance prohibit an operator or a vendor from conducting activities under this chapter within the municipality.

History.

(§ 14 ch 99 SLA 1988; am § 16 ch 70 SLA 1993)

Sec. 05.15.128.
Revocation of operator’s license.

The department shall revoke the license of an operator who does not

report an adjusted gross income of at least 15 percent of gross income annually based on the total operation of the operator; or

pay to each authorizing permittee annually at least 30 percent of the adjusted gross income, as determined under (1) of this subsection, from a pull-tab activity or at least 10 percent of the adjusted gross income, as determined under (1) of this subsection, from a gaming activity other than pull-tabs, received from activities conducted on behalf of the authorizing permittee.

A person, municipality, or qualified organization whose operator’s license has been revoked under this section may appeal the revocation if the person, municipality, or qualified organization submits to and pays for a complete audit of the operator’s financial records by the department. The results of the audit are conclusive.

History.

(§ 14 ch 99 SLA 1988; am § 17 ch 70 SLA 1993)

Administrative Code. —

For permits and licenses, see 15 AAC 160, art. 1.

For operators, see 15 AAC 160, art. 2.

For accounting and recordkeeping, see 15 AAC 160, art. 8.

For suspension and revocation, see 15 AAC 160, art. 9.

For hearings, see 15 AAC 160, art. 10.

Sec. 05.15.130.
Department may impose additional requirements.

The department may supplement the definitions of qualified organizations and activities by regulations adopted under this chapter adding to the definitions additional requirements that the department considers necessary for the best interests of the public or for the proper administration of this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 d ch 27 SLA 1960; am E.O. No. 82 § 8 (1993))

Administrative Code. —

For permits and licenses, see 15 AAC 160, art. 1.

For multiple-beneficiary permits and self-directed permits, see 15 AAC 160, art. 4.

For accounting and recordkeeping, see 15 AAC 160, art. 8.

Sec. 05.15.140.
Proof necessary to qualify for permit.

The department may not issue or renew a permit except upon satisfactory proof that the applicant is a municipality or qualified organization, the activity may be permitted under this chapter, and the issuance of a permit is not detrimental to the best interests of the public. Upon request of the department, the applicant shall prove conclusively each of these requirements before a permit may be issued or renewed.

In an application for a permit, a municipality or qualified organization shall disclose the name and address of each person responsible for the operation of the activity and whether any person named

has been convicted of a violation of a law of this state that is, or a law or ordinance of another state that would be if committed in this state, an unclassified felony described in AS 11, a Class A felony, extortion, or a violation of a law or ordinance of this state or another jurisdiction that is a crime involving theft or dishonesty or a violation of gambling laws; or

has a prohibited financial interest, as defined in regulations adopted by the department, in the operation of the activity.

[Repealed, § 37 ch 70 SLA 1993.]

Application forms for permits must contain a notice that a false statement in the application is punishable by law.

History.

(§ 1 d ch 27 SLA 1960; am § 4 ch 27 SLA 1982; am § 3 ch 59 SLA 1983; am §§ 15, 16 ch 99 SLA 1988; am E.O. No. 74 § 3 (1989); am §§ 18, 37 ch 70 SLA 1993; am E.O. No. 82 § 9 (1993))

Administrative Code. —

For permits and licenses, see 15 AAC 160, art. 1.

For suspension and revocation, see 15 AAC 160, art. 9.

Sec. 05.15.145.
Multiple-beneficiary permits.

Two to six municipalities or qualified organizations, or a combination of two to six municipalities and qualified organizations, may jointly apply for a multiple-beneficiary permit under AS

05.15.100(d)

. The commissioner may not issue or renew a permit except upon satisfactory proof that each joint applicant is a municipality or qualified organization, the activity may be permitted under this chapter, and the issuance of a permit is not detrimental to the best interests of the public. Upon request of the commissioner, the joint applicants shall prove conclusively each of these requirements before a permit may be issued or renewed.

The provisions of AS

05.15.140(b)

— (d) apply to multiple-beneficiary permits and applications for them.

A municipality or qualified organization that is among the holders of a multiple-beneficiary permit may withdraw from the permit by giving written notice of intent to withdraw to the department and to the other holders of the permit. The effective date of the withdrawal is 30 days after the department receives written notice of intent. A municipality or qualified organization that withdraws from a multiple-beneficiary permit may apply for a permit under AS

05.15.100(a)

, but its share of the prizes awarded under the multiple-beneficiary permit and the prizes it awards under its own permit are subject to the maximums established in AS

05.15.180(g)

.

The holders of a multiple-beneficiary permit shall jointly file reports with the department that comply with the reporting requirements imposed on operators under AS

05.15.083

.

History.

(§ 19 ch 70 SLA 1993)

Administrative Code. —

For permits and licenses, see 15 AAC 160, art. 1.

For operators, see 15 AAC 160, art. 2.

For multiple-beneficiary permits and self-directed permits, see 15 AAC 160, art. 4.

For bingo, see 15 AAC 160, art. 6.

Sec. 05.15.150.
Limitation on use of proceeds.

The authority to conduct the activity authorized by this chapter is contingent upon the dedication of the net proceeds of the charitable gaming activity to the awarding of prizes to contestants or participants and to political, educational, civic, public, charitable, patriotic, or religious uses in the state. In this subsection, “political, educational, civic, public, charitable, patriotic, or religious uses” means uses benefiting persons either by bringing them under the influence of education or religion or relieving them from disease, suffering, or constraint, or by assisting them in establishing themselves in life, or by providing for the promotion of the welfare and well-being of the membership of the organization within their own community, or through aiding candidates for public office or groups that support candidates for public office, or by erecting or maintaining public buildings or works, or lessening the burden on government, but does not include

the direct or indirect payment of any portion of the net proceeds of a bingo or pull-tab game to a lobbyist registered under AS 24.45;

the erection, acquisition, improvement, maintenance, or repair of real, personal, or mixed property unless it is used exclusively for one or more of the permitted uses; or

the direct or indirect payment of any portion of the net proceeds of a charitable gaming activity, except the proceeds of a raffle and lottery,

to aid candidates for public office or groups that support or oppose candidates for public office;

to a political party or to an organization affiliated with a political party; or

to a group, as that term is defined in AS

15.13.400

, or a political group, as that term is defined in AS 15.80, that seeks to influence the outcome of an election.

The net proceeds derived from the activity must be devoted within one year to one or more of the uses stated in (a) of this section. A municipality or qualified organization desiring to hold the net proceeds for a period longer than one year must apply to the department for special permission and upon good cause shown the department may grant the request.

History.

(§ 1 e ch 27 SLA 1960; am § 2 ch 66 SLA 1976; am § 5 ch 27 SLA 1982; am § 20 ch 70 SLA 1993; am E.O. No. 82 § 10 (1993); am § 2 ch 48 SLA 1996)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2010, in (a)(3)(C) of this section, “AS 15.80” was substituted for “AS 15.60” to reflect the 2010 renumbering of AS 15.60.

In 2014, “In this subsection” was added in the second sentence of (a) to conform to the style of the Alaska Statutes.

Administrative Code. —

For accounting and recordkeeping, see 15 AAC 160, art. 8.

For suspension and revocation, see 15 AAC 160, art. 9.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Proceeds from raffles may be donated, not loaned, to a political candidate and may not exceed the $1000 limitation imposed by AS

15.13.070

.
This limit applies even if the permit holder is a “controlled group” under AS

15.13.130

(4).
June 15, 1987 Op. Att’y Gen.

A political entity could obtain a permit for and conduct bingo or pull-tab games, but it could not use any of the proceeds for general operating funds, or for any purpose connected to the entity’s objectives. For all purposes, there is virtually nothing that a political entity could do for itself with funds raised from the conduct of charitable games other than raffles and lotteries. A political entity could, though, raise funds using pull-tabs or bingo and donate these in their entirety to an eleemosynary organization or a municipality. May 16, 1997 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 05.15.160.
Authorized expenses.

The only expenses that may be incurred or paid in connection with the operation of an activity under a permit issued under this chapter are bona fide expenses reasonably necessary for

goods, wares, and merchandise necessary for the operation of the activity;

personal services involved with the operation of the activity, including those performed by

an employee of the permittee; or

an operator hired by the permittee to conduct the activity if the compensation is not related to the receipts from the activity.

Municipalities, qualified organizations, and operators may pay their employees a reasonable amount in wages or other compensation for personal services rendered by their employees while the employees are engaged in activities subject to this chapter. A reasonable amount of compensation is an amount approximating the amount ordinarily paid by similar businesses for similar work performed under similar circumstances.

The total amount of authorized expenses that may be incurred under (a) of this section in connection with a pull-tab activity may not exceed 70 percent of the adjusted gross income from that pull-tab activity.

The total amount of authorized expenses that may be incurred under (a) of this section in connection with any gaming activity other than pull-tabs or Calcutta pools may not exceed 90 percent of the adjusted gross income from that gaming activity.

The total amount of expenses that may be incurred and prizes that may be awarded under (a) of this section in connection with a Calcutta pool may not exceed 50 percent of the pool of wagers.

History.

(§ 1 e ch 27 SLA 1960; am § 4 ch 59 SLA 1983; am §§ 17, 18 ch 99 SLA 1988; am § 21 ch 70 SLA 1993; am §§ 6, 7 ch 43 SLA 2005)

Administrative Code. —

For operators, see 15 AAC 160, art. 2.

For pull-tab games, see 15 AAC 160, art. 5.

For accounting and recordkeeping, see 15 AAC 160, art. 8.

Sec. 05.15.165.
Operators.

An operator shall pay net proceeds to the authorizing permittee by check.

If the department finds that an operator has incurred expenses that are not authorized under AS

05.15.160

, the department shall order the operator to refund to the authorizing permittee the amount of the unauthorized expenses. The operator shall pay the authorizing permittee interest on the amount ordered to be paid at the rate of 1.5 percent a month for each month or fraction of a month between the date of the activity and the date the refund is made.

The operator shall post in a public place on the premises where the activities are conducted the operator’s license and a copy of the permit of each authorizing permittee with whom the operator has a contract to conduct activities at the location.

An operator shall obtain liability insurance covering each location where the licensee conducts an activity subject to this chapter. The operator shall provide upon request proof of insurance for each location to the department. The operator and the insurer shall inform the department of changes in the coverage of the insurance or of cancellation of the insurance. Cancellation of the insurance immediately suspends the rights of the operator to conduct activities under this chapter at the location covered by the insurance until subsequent insurance is obtained.

An operator shall have its financial records reviewed annually by a certified public accountant. The operator shall submit the results of the review to the department by February 28 of the year following the year for which the review is conducted.

An operator may not

charge losses resulting from bad checks or uncollectable debts against the net proceeds due to the authorizing permittee;

extend credit to players;

employ house players;

allow the operator’s employees to play a game conducted by the operator at the location where the employee works for the operator.

History.

(§ 19 ch 99 SLA 1988)

Administrative Code. —

For permits and licenses, see 15 AAC 160, art. 1.

For operators, see 15 AAC 160, art. 2.

For bingo, see 15 AAC 160, art. 6.

Sec. 05.15.167.
Operator’s bond.

The bond or security filed under AS

05.15.122(b)

must be made payable to the department and must be conditioned upon payment of the amounts due to the department and payment of net proceeds due to the authorizing permittee. If the operator fails to make the required payments, the operator forfeits the bond or security to the department.

The amount forfeited under (a) of this section shall be first used to satisfy delinquent fees, interest, and penalties due the department under this chapter. If the bond or security is not exhausted by payment of delinquent fees, interest, and penalties, the department may use the remaining amount to pay net proceeds due an authorizing permittee. The total amount available for payment of net proceeds shall be prorated among the permittees to whom proceeds are due from that operator.

The operator and the surety shall inform the department if the bond is cancelled or the security is impaired.

History.

(§ 19 ch 99 SLA 1988)

Administrative Code. —

For permits and licenses, see 15 AAC 160, art. 1.

For operators, see 15 AAC 160, art. 2.

Sec. 05.15.170.
Suspension or revocation of permit, license, or vendor registration.

The department may suspend, for a period of up to one year, or revoke a permit, license, or vendor registration, after giving notice to and an opportunity to be heard by the permittee or licensee if the permittee, licensee, or vendor

violates or fails to comply with a requirement of this chapter or of a regulation adopted under this chapter;

breaches a contractual agreement with a permittee, licensee, or registered vendor;

becomes disqualified to participate in charitable gaming as provided in AS

05.15.105

; for the purposes of this paragraph, a permittee, licensee, or vendor that is not a natural person is considered convicted if an owner or manager of the permittee, licensee, or vendor is convicted;

knowingly submits false information to the department or, in the case of a registered vendor, to a permittee when the vendor knows that the false information will be submitted to the department as part of an application for registration; or

gives or acts upon any inside information on the status of the prizes awarded or to be awarded in a pull-tab game.

If the department revokes a license or vendor registration under this section, it may prohibit the licensee or vendor from reapplying for a license or vendor registration for a period of not more than five years. If the department revokes a permit under this section, it may prohibit the permittee from reapplying for a permit for a period of not more than one year.

History.

(§ 5 ch 27 SLA 1960; am § 22 ch 70 SLA 1993)

Revisor’s notes. —

Section 11 of E.O. 82 (1993) substituted “department” for “commissioner” in this section, effective July 1, 1993. However, because § 22, ch. 70, SLA 1993, effective June 26, 1993, had already repealed and reenacted the section and used “department” instead of “commissioner,” E.O. 82 was treated as not amending this section.

Administrative Code. —

For permits and licenses, see 15 AAC 160, art. 1.

For pull-tab games, see 15 AAC 160, art. 5.

For raffles, lotteries, and other gaming activities, see 15 AAC 160, art. 7.

For suspension and revocation, see 15 AAC 160, art. 9.

For hearings, see 15 AAC 160, art. 10.

Sec. 05.15.180.
Limitations on authorized activity.

This chapter does not authorize the use of playing cards, dice, roulette wheels, coin-operated instruments or machines, or other objects or instruments used, designed, or intended primarily for gaming or gambling, or any other method or implement not expressly authorized by the department.

With the exception of raffles, lotteries, bingo games, pull-tab games, race classics, rain classics, goose classics, mercury classics, deep freeze classics, dog mushers’ contests, snow classics, snow machine classics, canned salmon classics, salmon classics, animal classics, crane classics, cabbage classics, Calcutta pools, big bull moose derbies, and king salmon classics, a permit may not be issued for an activity under this chapter unless it existed in the state in substantially the same form and was conducted in substantially the same manner before January 1, 1959. A permit may not be issued for a snow machine classic under this chapter unless it has been in existence for at least five years before the permit is issued. A permit may not be issued for an animal classic under this chapter unless it was in existence before November 1, 2002.

[Repealed, § 5 ch 105 SLA 1995.]

The total value of door prizes offered or awarded under authority of a permit issued to a municipality or qualified organization under this chapter or under authority of a multiple-beneficiary permit may not exceed $20,000 a month or $240,000 a year.

The total value of all door prizes offered or awarded at a single facility or bingo hall or parlor by an operator on behalf of authorizing permittees may not exceed $20,000 a month or $240,000 a year.

A person under the age of 19 years may not play a bingo game.

A municipality or a qualified organization may award a maximum of $2,000,000 in prizes each year in activities authorized under this chapter; however, if a municipality or a qualified organization contracts with an operator to conduct on its behalf activities authorized under this chapter, the municipality or qualified organization may award a maximum of $500,000 in prizes each year. A municipality or a qualified organization that conducts a contest of skill and awards more than $1,000,000 in prizes to the participants in that contest of skill may exclude $1,000,000 in prizes awarded to those participants from the $2,000,000 maximum allowed in this subsection. The holders of a multiple-beneficiary permit under AS

05.15.100(d)

may award a maximum in prizes each year of $2,000,000 times the number of holders of the permit for activities authorized under this chapter. In this subsection, “activities authorized under this chapter” means all activities subject to this chapter other than bingo.

Only one Calcutta pool permit may be issued for each event and is limited to the permittee conducting the event or a permittee authorized by the person conducting the event if the person is not eligible to be a permittee. A Calcutta pool may not be conducted for elementary, secondary, or post-secondary school sporting events or for youth organization events. A person may not wager on a Calcutta pool unless the person is at least 18 years of age. A permittee may not accept a wager on a contestant or entrant in a Calcutta pool unless the contestant or entrant is or are 18 years of age or older. A person may not place a wager on a contestant or entrant in a Calcutta pool unless the contestant or entrant is or are 18 years of age or older. A Calcutta pool may not be conducted unless the rules for the pool are publicly posted and available to all participants in the pool.

History.

(§ 2 ch 27 SLA 1960; am § 3 ch 66 SLA 1976; am §§ 5, 6 ch 59 SLA 1983; am § 2 ch 93 SLA 1986; am § 3 ch 94 SLA 1986; am §§ 20, 21 ch 99 SLA 1988; am § 4 ch 24 SLA 1991; am §§ 23 — 25 ch 70 SLA 1993; am E.O. No. 82 §§ 12, 13 (1993); am § 3 ch 16 SLA 1994; am §§ 5, 6 ch 13 SLA 1995; am § 3 ch 104 SLA 1995; am §§ 3 — 5 ch 105 SLA 1995; am §§ 1, 3 ch 35 SLA 1997; am § 3 ch 41 SLA 1997; am § 1 ch 149 SLA 2003; am § 3 ch 162 SLA 2004; am §§ 8, 9 ch 43 SLA 2005; am §§ 3, 4 ch 20 SLA 2008; am § 3 ch 62 SLA 2012; am § 4 ch 22 SLA 2014)

Revisor’s notes. —

Section 6, ch. 13, SLA 1995 contained a delayed amendment to subsection (b), to take effect January 1, 2000.
Section 6, ch. 13, SLA 1995 was itself amended by § 3, ch. 35, SLA 1997 and § 8, ch. 41, SLA 1997.
The amendment in § 8, ch. 41, SLA 1997 erroneously contained a reference to AS

05.15.100(b)

, which had been repealed in 1995, and also failed to include the second sentence of subsection (b), which had been added in 1995.
However, § 3, ch. 35 SLA 1997 did not contain either error and therefore, effective January 1, 2000, it was used, with the addition of “race classics” from § 8, ch. 41, SLA 1997, in reconciling chs. 35 and 41, SLA 1997.

Administrative Code. —

For operators, see 15 AAC 160, art. 2.

For multiple-beneficiary permits and self-directed permits, see 15 AAC 160, art. 4.

For bingo, see 15 AAC 160, art. 6.

For raffles, lotteries, and other gaming activities, see 15 AAC 160, art. 7.

For accounting and recordkeeping, see 15 AAC 160, art. 8.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2012 amendment, effective September 10, 2012, in (b), added “snow classics,” following “dog mushers’ contests,”.

The 2014 amendment, effective September 15, 2014, in (b), in the first sentence, inserted “big bull moose derbies,” following “Calcutta pools,” and substituted “a permit may not be issued for an activity” for “an activity may not be licensed”, in the second sentence substituted “A permit may not be issued for a snow machine classic” for “A snow machine classic may not be licensed” and “the permit is issued” for “the licensing”, and in the third sentence substituted “A permit may not be issued for an animal classic” for “An animal classic may not be licensed”.

Opinions of attorney general. —

The limitation in subsection (a) on machines intended primarily for gaming or gambling applies to token-operated bingo machines. November 6, 1987 Op. Att’y Gen.

The department must adopt regulations in order to exercise its authority to approve the use of pull-tab dispensing machines. This is based on a reading of AS

05.15.060(a)(6)

, together with AS

05.15.180(a)

, and the all-encompassing definition of regulation contained in AS

44.62.640(a)(3)

. Alaska Statute

05.15.060(a)(6)

provides that the department shall adopt regulations governing the equipment that may be used in conducting authorized activities. April 16, 1998 Op. Att’y Gen.

Promoting the sale of pre-paid phone cards through a cash prize sweepstakes, without a gaming permit, is illegal in Alaska. Conducting such an enterprise would be a criminal offense under AS 05.15 and AS 11.66. The use of coin-operated instruments designed or intended primarily for gaming or gambling is prohibited by AS

05.15.180(a)

. The possession of a gambling device is made criminal by AS

11.66.260

. The ban on coin-operated gaming instruments applies to the phone card dispensers, and they are gaming devices for purposes of AS 11.66. Oct. 17, 2000 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 05.15.181.
Pull-tab manufacturers.

A person may not manufacture pull-tabs in the state, and may not sell or distribute a pull-tab that the person has manufactured outside of the state to persons in the state, unless the person has received a pull-tab manufacturer’s license issued by the department.

The department may issue a pull-tab manufacturer’s license to a person who pays an annual fee of $2,500.

Each series of pull-tabs manufactured in the state must be sealed and have a serial number label issued by the National Association of Fundraising Ticket Manufacturers or other serial number label approved by the department.

A pull-tab manufacturer may distribute pull-tabs only to a licensed pull-tab distributor unless the pull-tab manufacturer is also a licensed pull-tab distributor.

Each pull-tab manufacturer shall report to the department by the last business day of the month on each series of pull-tabs distributed during the preceding month, including the serial number of each series distributed and the name of the distributor to whom the series was distributed.

History.

(§ 22 ch 99 SLA 1988; am §§ 26, 27 ch 70 SLA 1993)

Administrative Code. —

For permits and licenses, see 15 AAC 160, art. 1.

For pull-tab games, see 15 AAC 160, art. 5.

For suspension and revocation, see 15 AAC 160, art. 9.

Sec. 05.15.183.
Pull-tab distributors.

A person may not distribute pull-tab games unless the person has received a pull-tab distributor’s license issued by the department.

The department may issue a pull-tab distributor’s license to a person who pays an annual fee of $1,000.

Pull-tabs may be distributed only from a location in the state. A person may not distribute pull-tabs directly to another person in the state from a location outside of this state.

A pull-tab distributor shall report to the department by the last business day of each month on each pull-tab series distributed in the preceding month. The report must include the name of the permittee to whom each series of pull-tabs is distributed and the serial number of each series.

A distributor may not

take an order for the purchase of a pull-tab series from a vendor;

sell a pull-tab series to a vendor; or

deliver a pull-tab series to a vendor.

History.

(§ 22 ch 99 SLA 1988; am § 28 ch 70 SLA 1993)

Administrative Code. —

For permits and licenses, see 15 AAC 160, art. 1.

For pull-tab games, see 15 AAC 160, art. 5.

For suspension and revocation, see 15 AAC 160, art. 9.

Sec. 05.15.184.
Pull-tab tax.

A pull-tab distributor shall collect a tax of three percent of an amount equal to the gross receipts less prizes awarded on each series of pull-tabs distributed. The pull-tab distributor shall pay to the department the tax collected in the preceding month at the time that the report under AS

05.15.183(d)

is filed with the department.

History.

(§ 22 ch 99 SLA 1988)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

05.15.183(e)

.
Renumbered in 1988.

Administrative Code. —

For pull-tab games, see 15 AAC 160, art. 5.

For suspension and revocation, see 15 AAC 160, art. 9.